District of Columbia statutes.
29-809.04

Filings required for merger; effective date.

(a)

After each constituent company has approved a merger, articles of merger shall be signed on behalf of each constituent company, as provided in § 29-802.03(a).

(b)

Articles of merger under this section shall include:

(1)

The name of each constituent company and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

(2)

The name of the surviving company, the jurisdiction of its governing statute, and, if the surviving company is created by the merger, a statement to that effect;

(3)

The date the merger is effective under the governing statute of the surviving company;

(4)

If the surviving company is to be created by the merger, the company’s certificate of organization;

(5)

If the surviving company preexists the merger, any amendments provided for in the plan of merger for its certificate of organization;

(6)

A statement as to each constituent company that the merger was approved as required by the company’s governing statute;

(7)

If the surviving company is a foreign limited liability company not authorized to do business in the District, the street and mailing addresses of an office that the Mayor may use for the purposes of § 29-809.05(b); and

(8)

Any additional information required by the governing statute of any constituent company.

(c)

Each constituent company shall deliver the articles of merger for filing with the Mayor.

(d)

A merger shall be effective under this chapter upon the later of:

(1)

Compliance with subsection (c) of this section; or

(2)

Subject to § 29-802.05(c) and subchapter II of Chapter 2 of this title, as specified in the articles of merger.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-809.03.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1004 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).